Washington statutes.
RCW 18.20.330

Intermittent nursing services.

(1) Assisted living facilities are not required to provide intermittent nursing services. The assisted living facility licensee may choose to provide any of the following intermittent nursing services through appropriately licensed and credentialed staff, however, the facility may or may not need to provide additional intermittent nursing services to comply with the reasonable accommodation requirements in federal or state law:

(a) Medication administration;

(b) Administration of health care treatments;

(c) Diabetic management;

(d) Nonroutine ostomy care;

(e) Tube feeding; and

(f) Nurse delegation consistent with chapter 18.79 RCW.

(2) The licensee shall clarify on the disclosure form any limitations, additional services, or conditions that may apply under this section.

(3) In providing intermittent nursing services, the assisted living facility shall observe the resident for changes in overall functioning and respond appropriately when there are observable or reported changes in the resident's physical, mental, or emotional functioning.

(4) The assisted living facility may provide intermittent nursing services to the extent permitted by RCW 18.20.160.

[ 2012 c 10 s 22; 2004 c 142 s 5.]

NOTES:

Application—2012 c 10: See note following RCW 18.20.010.

Effective dates—2004 c 142: See note following RCW 18.20.020.